New York, session 2025-2026, A8541.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The department of public service, in conjunction with the 2 New York state energy research and development authority, and the power 3 authority of the state of New York shall commission a study on the 4 utilization of directional noise reduction optimization technology for 5 wind turbines in New York state. The study shall evaluate the effective- 6 ness of directional noise reduction optimization technology in reducing 7 noise levels and its impact on energy production as compared with other 8 operational methods of reducing wind turbine noise levels. 9 § 2. Such study shall include: 10 a. an assessment of current operational noise mitigation methods 11 implemented across New York State at currently operating wind facili- 12 ties; 13 b. an assessment of the current deployment of directional noise 14 reduction optimization in wind turbines within New York state and other 15 regions with similar conditions, as appropriate; 16 c. an analysis of existing peer-reviewed studies on directional noise 17 reduction optimization and related noise reduction technologies, if 18 available; 19 d. an analysis of current directional noise reduction optimization 20 technology, including existing directional noise reduction optimization 21 technologies and their effectiveness in different environmental condi- 22 tions; EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD11566-01-5 A. 8541 2 1 e. collaboration with existing wind facilities within New York state 2 to gather data on noise levels, turbine operations, and energy output, 3 at facilities implementing directional noise reduction optimization 4 compared with facilities implementing other noise mitigation methods; 5 and 6 f. a comparison of energy production of turbines with and without 7 directional noise reduction optimization implementation under various 8 operational conditions, including a comparison of energy production with 9 noise reduction techniques that more broadly apply these techniques in 10 all wind directions. 11 § 3. Upon completion of the study, the department of public service, 12 in conjunction with the New York state energy research and development 13 authority, and the power authority of the state of New York shall joint- 14 ly provide recommendations for the utilization of directional noise 15 reduction optimization technology in the state and, if appropriate, 16 suggest statutory or regulatory amendments needed to support the inte- 17 gration of directional noise reduction optimization in the state's 18 renewable energy strategy. 19 § 4. The study shall be commissioned within one hundred eighty days of 20 the effective date of this act and submitted, with recommendations, to 21 the legislature within one year from the date of such commissioning. 22 § 5. This act shall be effective immediately.